Utah statutes.
67-11-3.   General powers of state agency and interstate instrumentalities.
(1)  The state agency, with the approval of the governor, is hereby authorized
to enter on behalf of the state into an agreement with the federal security
administrator, consistent with the terms and provisions of this chapter, for
the purpose of extending the benefits of the federal old-age and survivors
insurance system to employees of the state or any political subdivision
thereof with respect to services specified in such agreement which constitute
"employment" as defined in Section 67-11-2.  Such agreement may contain such
provisions relating to coverage, benefits, contributions, effective date,
modification and termination of the agreement, administration, and other
appropriate provisions as the state agency and federal security administrator
shall agree upon.  However, except as may be otherwise required or permitted
by or under the Social Security Act as to the services to be covered, such
agreement shall provide in effect that:
(a)  Benefits will be provided for employees whose services are covered by the
agreement (and their dependents and survivors) on the same basis as though
such services constituted employment within the meaning of Title II of the
Social Security Act.
(b)  The state will pay to the secretary of the treasury of the United States,
at such time or times as may be prescribed under the Social Security Act,
contributions with respect to wages, as defined in Section 67-11-2, equal to
the sum of the taxes which would be imposed by Sections 1400 and 1410 of the
Federal Insurance Contributions Act if the services covered by the agreement
constituted employment within the meaning of that act.
(c)  The agreement shall be effective with respect to services in employment
covered by the agreement performed after a date specified therein but in no
event may it be effective with respect to any such services performed prior to
January 1, 1951, and in no case prior to an employment period with reference
to which said insurance coverage can be obtained under the provisions of the
Social Security Act.
(d)  All services which constitute employment as defined in Section 67-11-2
and are performed in the employ of the state by employees of the state, shall
be covered by the agreement.
(e)  All services which constitute employment as defined in Section 67-11-2,
are performed in the employ of a political subdivision of the state, and are
covered by a plan which is in conformity with the terms of the agreement and
has been approved by the state agency under Section 67-11-5, shall be covered
by the agreement.
(2)  Any instrumentality jointly created by this state and any other state or
states is hereby authorized, upon the granting of like authority by such other
state or states:
(a)  to enter into an agreement with the federal security administrator
whereby the benefits of the federal old-age and survivors insurance system
shall be extended to employees of such instrumentality;
(b)  to require its employees to pay, and for that purpose to deduct from
their wages, contributions equal to the amounts which they would be required
to pay under Subsection 67-11-4(1) if they were covered by an agreement made
pursuant to Subsection (1); and
(c)  to make payments to the secretary of the treasury in accordance with such
agreement, including payments from its own funds, and otherwise to comply with
such agreements.
(3)  An agreement shall, to the extent practicable, be consistent with the
terms and provisions of Subsections (1) and (2) and other provisions of this
chapter.
